src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-lakw06-09_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - lakõ2: # Noun (9) lakõ2 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     lakõ+Hom2+A+Sg+Nom: lakõ
     lakõ+Hom2+A+Sg+Gen: lakõ
     lakõ+Hom2+A+Sg+Par: lakõt
     lakõ+Hom2+A+Sg+Ill: lagõhõhe
     lakõ+Hom2+A+Sg+Ine: lakõn
     lakõ+Hom2+A+Sg+Ela: lakõst
     lakõ+Hom2+A+Sg+All: lakõlõ
     lakõ+Hom2+A+Sg+Ade: lakõl
     lakõ+Hom2+A+Sg+Abl: lakõlt
     lakõ+Hom2+A+Sg+Tra: lakõs
     lakõ+Hom2+A+Sg+Ter: lakõniq
     lakõ+Hom2+A+Sg+Abe: lakõldaq
     lakõ+Hom2+A+Sg+Com: lakõgaq
     lakõ+Hom2+A+Pl+Nom: lakõq
     lakõ+Hom2+A+Pl+Gen: lagõhidõ
     lakõ+Hom2+A+Pl+Par: lagõhit
     lakõ+Hom2+A+Pl+Ill: lagõhihe
     lakõ+Hom2+A+Pl+Ine: lagõhin
     lakõ+Hom2+A+Pl+Ela: lagõhist
     lakõ+Hom2+A+Pl+All: lagõhilõ
     lakõ+Hom2+A+Pl+Ade: lagõhil
     lakõ+Hom2+A+Pl+Abl: lagõhilt
     lakõ+Hom2+A+Pl+Tra: lagõhis
     lakõ+Hom2+A+Pl+Ter: lagõhiniq
     lakõ+Hom2+A+Pl+Abe: lagõhildaq
     lakõ+Hom2+A+Pl+Com: lagõhidõgaq
